North Carolina, session 2025, HB615.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-366(a9) reads as rewritten:
"(a9) A student who is not a domiciliary of a local school administrative unit that resides
with a parent or legal guardian that is on active military duty shall be permitted to register to
enroll in the public schools of that unit by remote means, including electronic means, prior to
commencement of the student's residency in the local school administrative unit if all of the
following apply:subject to the following conditions:
(1) To be eligible to register to enroll prior to becoming a domiciliary, all of the
following conditions must be met:
a. A parent or legal guardian is on active military duty and (i) is
transferred or pending transfer pursuant to an official military order to
a military installation or reservation in the State.State or (ii) is
separating from active duty service within the next 12 months and
intends to establish residency in the State.
(2)b. Upon request by the local school administrative unit where the student
seeks to register to enroll, a parent or legal guardian provides (i) a copy
of the official military order transferring to a military installation or
reservation located in the State.State or (ii) an official military
document showing an anticipated date of separation. Each local school
administrative unit may determine the document or documents
sufficient to establish an anticipated date of separation so long as the
document required is easily accessible by the parent or legal guardian.
(3)c. A parent or legal guardian completes and submits the local school
administrative unit's required enrollment forms and documentation,
except that proof of residency and documentation related to
disciplinary actions pursuant to G.S. 115C-366(a4) shall not be
required until the student transfers into the local school administrative
unit, at which time they shall be required prior to commencing
attendance.
(2) Once registered to be enrolled, the following apply:
*H615-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. A local school administrative unit shall make available to a student
who registers to enroll pursuant to this subsection the same
opportunities available to a student enrolled contemporaneously with
domicilia, such as requesting or applying for school assignment,
registering for courses, and applying for any other programs that
require additional request or application.
b. A student enrolled pursuant to this subsection may not attend school
in the local school administrative unit until proof of residency is
provided in accordance with the requirements of the local school
administrative unit.the later of (i) one year from the parent or legal
guardian's reporting-for-duty or separation date or (ii) the end of the
school year in which the student began attending the school. The
parent or legal guardian shall provide proof of residency before the
expiration of the allotted period of attendance provided in this
sub-subdivision.
c. If a student begins attending a school pursuant to this subsection in
grade 11 or 12, the local school administrative unit shall extend the
period of attendance allowed under sub-subdivision b. of this
subdivision to allow the student to attend the school through high
school graduation.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to curtail a local school administrative unit's
authority pursuant to G.S. 115C-366(a5)."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 615-First Edition